Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4805
Farm mediation service; advise borrower of assistance programs.

After receiving a mediation request, the farm mediation service shall advise the borrower that financial and legal preparation assistance may be available. The farm mediation service shall provide any other available information regarding assistance programs to farmers.

Laws 1988, LB 664, § 5.